Delaware, session 153, HB256.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Section 3, Chapter 404, Volume 83 of the Laws of Delaware by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Section 3. This Act takes effect for the 2022-2023 school year. Section 2. Amend Section 3, Chapter 108, Volume 84 of the Laws of Delaware by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Section 3. This Act takes effect for the 2023-2024 school year. Section 3. Amend Â§ 4144, Title 14 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 4144. Pupil identification cards; publication of safety hotline numbers [For application of this section, see 83 Del. Laws, c. 404, Â§ 3; and 84 Del. Laws, c. 108, Â§ 3] . (a) All public schools serving pupils in grades 7 to 12 that issue pupil identification cards shall have printed on either side of the pupil identification card the following public safety telephone or text numbers: (1) National Suicide Prevention Lifeline: Call or text â988â. (2) National Domestic Violence Hotline: 1-800-799-7233 (SAFE). (3) Crisis Text Line: Text âDEâ to 741741. (4) Teen Dating Violence Hotline:1-866-331-9474 or Text âloveisâ to 22522. (5) Stop Bullying Now Hotline: 1-800-273-8255(TALK). (b) All public schools serving pupils in grades 7 to 12 that issue pupil identification cards, in addition to printing the required public safety numbers, numbers listed in subsection (a) of this section, section on the pupil identification cards, may also print the following telephone or text numbers: number for the National Sexual Assault Hotline: 1-800-656-4673(HOPE). (1) National Sexual Assault Hotline: 1-800-656-4673(HOPE). (2) Teen Dating Violence Hotline:1-866-331-9474 or Text âloveisâ to 22522. (3) Stop Bullying Now Hotline: 1-800-273-8255(TALK). (c) In the event If any of the numbers listed in subsection (a) or (b) of this section have been updated updated, the most updated numbers shall must be printed on the pupil identification card. card when the card is reissued or reprinted. (d) If a public school has unissued pupil identification cards, cards that do not comply with the requirements of subsection (a) of this section, the school may continue to issue the identification cards until they are the schoolâs supply of identification cards is depleted. Section 4. Amend Â§ 9001B, Title 14 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 9001B. Publication of safety hotline numbers [For application of this section, see 83 Del. Laws, c. 404, Â§ 3; and 84 Del. Laws, c. 108, Â§ 3] . (a) Every public institution of higher learning in this State that issues student identification cards shall have printed on either side of the student identification cards card the following public safety telephone and text numbers: (1) National Suicide Prevention Lifeline: Call or text â988â. (2) National Domestic Violence Hotline: 1-800-799-7233(SAFE). (3) Crisis Text Line: Text âDEâ to 741741. (4) Local campus police or campus security phone number. (b) Every public institution of higher learning in this State that issues student identification cards, in addition to printing the required public safety numbers listed in subsection (a) of this section, section on the student identification card, may also print the following telephone number: number for the National Sexual Assault Hotline: 1-800-656-4673(HOPE). (c) In the event If any of the numbers listed in subsection (a) or (b) of this section have been updated updated, the most updated numbers shall must be printed on the student identification cards. card when the card is reissued or reprinted. (d) If an a public institution of higher learning has unissued student identification cards, cards that do not comply with the requirements of subsection (a) of this section, the institution may continue to issue the identification cards until they are the institutionâs supply of the identification cards is depleted. Section 5. This Act takes effect on July 1, 2026.